test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-haeggga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - hägga: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no CGrad, but umlaut)
    hägga+N+Sg+Nom: hägga
    hägga+N+Sg+Gen: hiegga
    hägga+N+Sg+Acc: hieggav
    hägga+N+Sg+Ill: häggaj
    hägga+N+Sg+Ine: hieggan
    hägga+N+Sg+Ela: [hieggast, hieggas]
    hägga+N+Sg+Com: [hieggajn, hieggajna]
    hägga+N+Pl+Nom: hiegga
    hägga+N+Pl+Gen: hieggaj
    hägga+N+Pl+Acc: hieggajd
    hägga+N+Pl+Ill: hieggajda
    hägga+N+Pl+Ine: hieggajn
    hägga+N+Pl+Ela: [hieggajst, hieggajs]
    hägga+N+Pl+Com: [hieggaj, hieggajgum]
    hägga+N+Ess: häggan
    hägga+N+Abe: hieggadak
